Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.290

Lien for labor, material, equipment used in controlling noxious weeds—Notice of lien.

Every county noxious weed control board furnishing labor, materials, or supplies or renting, leasing, or otherwise supplying equipment to be used in the control of noxious weeds upon any property pursuant to RCW 17.10.160 and 17.10.170 or pursuant to an order under RCW 17.10.210 as now or hereafter amended, shall give to the owner or reputed owner or his or her agent a notice in writing, within ninety days from the date of the cessation of the performance of such labor, the furnishing of such materials, or the supplying of such equipment, which notice shall cover the labor, material, supplies, or equipment furnished or leased, as well as all subsequent labor, materials, supplies, or equipment furnished or leased, stating in substance and effect that such county noxious weed control board is furnishing or has furnished labor, materials and supplies or equipment for use thereon, with the name of the county noxious weed control board ordering the same, and that a lien may be claimed for all materials and supplies or equipment furnished by such county noxious weed control board for use thereon, which notice shall be given by mailing the same by registered or certified mail in an envelope addressed to the owner at his or her place of residence or reputed residence.

[ 2011 c 336 s 457; 1987 c 438 s 36; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 14.]